California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 property and, to the extent of actual knowledge of the broker, pertinent information about other loans that the borrower expects or anticipates will result in a lien being recorded against the property securing the promissory note to be created in favor of the prospective lender.

As used in this paragraph, actual knowledge with respect to any anticipated or expected loan, means knowledge gained by the broker through arranging that other loan or receipt of written notification of that other loan. In this regard, the broker shall also provide to the prospective lender the option to apply to purchase a title insurance policy or an endorsement to an existing title insurance policy covering the securing property, and a copy of a written loan application, and a credit report.

(7) Provisions for servicing of the loan, if any, including disposition of the late charge and prepayment penalty fees paid by the
 borrower.

(8) Detailed information concerning any proposed arrangement under which the prospective lender along with persons not otherwise associated with him or her will be joint beneficiaries or obligees.

(9) If the solicitation is subject to the provisions of Section 10231.2, a detailed statement of the intended use and disposition of the funds being solicited including an explanation of the nature and extent of the benefits to be directly or indirectly derived by the broker.

(10) If the broker is subject to the provisions of Section 10232 or Article 6 (commencing with Section 10237), a statement that the broker has a responsibility to make reasonable efforts to determine that the loan is a suitable and appropriate investment for the lender, based on information provided by the lender regarding the lender’s
 financial situation and investment objectives.

(b) If the real estate broker is performing acts described in subdivision (e) of Section 10131 or in Section 10131.1 in negotiating the sale of a real property sales contract or promissory note secured directly or collaterally by a lien on real property, the statement required to be given to the prospective purchaser by Section 10232.4 shall include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, the following information:

(1) Address or other means of identification of the real property that is the security for the trustor’s or vendee’s obligation.

(2) Estimated fair market value of the real property as determined by an appraisal, a copy of which shall be provided to the prospective purchaser. However, a purchaser may waive the requirement of an independent appraisal in
 writing, on a case-by-case basis, in which case, the real estate broker shall provide the broker’s written estimated fair market value of the securing property, which shall include the objective data upon which the broker’s estimate is based.

(3) Age, size, type of construction, and a description of improvements to the real property if known by the broker.

(4) Information available to the broker relative to the ability of the trustor or vendee to meet his or her contractual obligations under the note or contract including the trustor’s or vendee’s payment history under the note or contract.

(5) Terms of the contract or note including the principal balance owing.

(6) Provisions for servicing of the note or contract, if any, including disposition of late
 charge, prepayment penalty or other fees or charges paid by the trustor or vendee.

(7) Detailed information concerning any proposed arrangement under which the prospective purchaser along with persons not otherwise associated with him or her will be joint beneficiaries or obligees. In this regard, the broker shall also provide to the prospective purchaser the option to apply to purchase a title insurance policy or an endorsement to an existing title insurance policy covering the real property and, if available from the seller of the note or contract or from the original lender, a copy of a written loan application, and a credit report.

(8) A statement as to whether the dealer is acting as a principal or as an agent in the transaction with the prospective purchaser.

(9) If the broker is subject to the provisions of
 Section 10232 or Article 6 (commencing with Section 10237), a statement that the broker has a responsibility to make reasonable efforts to determine that the purchase is a suitable and appropriate investment for the purchaser, based on information provided by the purchaser regarding the purchaser’s financial situation and investment objectives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 669, Sec. 3.   (SB 978)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10232.6.

(a) A real estate broker, acting within the course and scope of his or her license, who arranges for or engages the services of an appraiser licensed or certified by the Office of Real Estate Appraisers for the applicable transaction, and delivers the resulting appraisal to the prospective lender and prospective purchaser as required by Section 10232.5, has met the broker’s obligation of full and complete disclosure solely pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10232.5 and paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 10232.5, and is not required to provide a separate estimate of fair market value under Section 10232.5.

(b) This section shall not apply in instances where the licensed or certified appraiser is an employee of the broker. However, the duty of disclosure shall not be deemed met where the broker knew or should have known that the referral was negligently made or that the fair market value provided by the appraiser was inaccurate.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to relieve the broker of any obligation or requirement to disclose what he or she knows about the value of the property.

(d) This section shall apply only to loan transactions and shall have no effect on a real estate broker’s duties of disclosure in purchase or sales transactions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   Effective September 12, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10233.

A real estate licensee who undertakes to service a promissory note secured directly or collaterally by a lien on real property or a real property sales contract shall comply with each of the following requirements:

(a) The licensee shall have a written authorization from the borrower, the lender, or the owner of the note or contract, that is included within the terms of a written servicing agreement that satisfies the requirements of paragraphs (1), (2), (4), and (5) of subdivision (k) of Section 10238.

(b) The licensee shall provide the lender or the owner of the note or contract with at least the following accountings:

(1) An accounting of the unpaid principal balance at the end of each year.

(2) An accounting of collections and disbursements received and made during each year.

(3) Each accounting required under this subdivision shall identify the person who holds the original note or contract and the deed of trust evidencing and securing the debt or obligation for which the accounting has been provided.

(c) The licensee shall provide to the lender or the owner of the note or contract written notification within 15 days of the occurrence of any of the following events:

(1) The recording of a notice of default.

(2) The recording of a notice of trustee’s sale.

(3) The receipt of any payment constituting an amount greater than or equal to five monthly payments, together with a request for partial or total reconveyance of the real property, in which case the notice shall also indicate any further transfer or delivery instructions.

(4) The delinquency of any installment or other obligation under the note or contract for over 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 153, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10233.1.

If a real estate broker in servicing a real property sales contract or a promissory note secured directly or collaterally by a lien on real property for the mortgagee, beneficiary, or owner of the note or contract, causes funds other than funds received from the obligor of the note or contract to be applied toward a payment to protect the security of the note or contract being serviced, including the payment of debt service on an obligation secured by the same real property having priority over the mortgage or deed of trust securing the promissory note that the broker is servicing, the broker shall, not later than 10 days after making any such payment, give written notice to the mortgagee, beneficiary, or owner of the date and amount of payment, the name of the person to whom payment was made, the source of funds, and the reason for making the payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 881, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

10233.2.

For the purposes of Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101) and Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code, when a broker, acting within the meaning of subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 10131 or Section 10131.1, has arranged a loan or sold a promissory note or any interest therein, and thereafter undertakes to service the promissory note on behalf of the lender or purchaser in accordance with Section 10233, delivery, transfer, and perfection shall be deemed complete even if the broker retains possession of the note or collateral instruments and documents, provided that the deed of trust or an assignment of the deed of trust or collateral documents in favor of the lender or purchaser is recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county in which the security property is located, and the note is made payable to the lender or is endorsed or assigned to the purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), every real estate licensee who negotiates a loan secured by a trust deed on real property shall cause the trust deed to be recorded, naming as beneficiary the lender or his or her nominee (who shall not be the licensee or the licensee’s nominee), with the county recorder of the county in which the real property is located prior to the time that any funds are disbursed, except when the lender has given written authorization for prior release.

(b) If funds are released on the lender’s written authorization as described in subdivision (a), the trust deed shall be recorded, or delivered to the lender or beneficiary with a written recommendation that it be recorded forthwith, within 10 days following release.

(c) Every real estate licensee who sells, exchanges, or negotiates the sale or exchange of a real property sales contract or a promissory note secured by a trust deed on real property shall cause a proper assignment of the real property sales contract or trust deed to be executed and shall cause the assignment to be recorded, naming as assignee the purchaser or his or her nominee (who shall not be the licensee or the licensee’s nominee), with the county recorder of the county in which the real property is located within 10 working days after the licensee or seller receives any funds from the buyer or after close of escrow; or shall deliver the real property sales contract or trust deed to the purchaser with a written recommendation that the assignment thereof be recorded forthwith.

(d) A trust deed may be recorded in the name of the real estate broker negotiating the loan if all of the following apply: (1) the lender or purchaser is any person or entity set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 10232, (2) the trust deed is recorded with the county recorder of the county in which the real property is located, and (3) the real property securing the loan as described in the trust deed is not a dwelling as defined in Section 10240.2 or unimproved real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 26, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.5.

In addition to the requirements of Section 10234, in the placing of any loan, a broker shall deliver or cause to be delivered conformed copies of any deed of trust to both the investor or lender and the borrower within a reasonable amount of time from the date of recording.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 641, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.

No real estate licensee shall knowingly advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, telecast or broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, televised or broadcast, in any manner any statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or conditions for making, purchasing or negotiating loans or real property sales contracts which is false misleading or deceptive.

Indicating or otherwise implying any specific yield or return on any note other than the interest rate specified in said note shall be prima facie evidence that such advertisement is misleading or deceptive unless the advertisement sets forth the actual interest rate specified in the note and the discount from the outstanding principal balance at which it is being offered for sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.5.

(a) A real estate licensee or mortgage loan originator shall not place an advertisement disseminated primarily in this state for a loan unless there is disclosed within the printed text of that advertisement, or the oral text in the case of a radio or television advertisement, the Department of Real Estate number and the unique identifier assigned to that licensee by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry under which the loan would be made or arranged.

(b) “Mortgage loan originator,” “unique identifier,” and “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” have the meanings set forth in Section 10166.01.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 68.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.

The commissioner in his or her discretion may honor requests from interested persons for interpretive opinions with respect to any provision of this article or with respect to any regulation for implementation of provisions of this article.

No provision of this article imposing any liability applies in the case of an act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with a written interpretive opinion of the commissioner or an opinion of the Attorney General, notwithstanding that the opinion may later be amended or rescinded or be determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.1.

No real estate licensee shall advertise to give or to offer to give to a prospective purchaser or lender any premium, gift or any other object of value as an inducement for making a loan, or purchasing a promissory note secured directly or collaterally by a lien on real property or a real property sales contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.2.

(a) A real estate broker who satisfies the criteria of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 10232 and who fails to notify the Department of Real Estate, in writing, of that fact within 30 days thereafter as required by subdivision (e) of Section 10232 shall be assessed a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) per day for each additional day written notification has not been received up to and including the 30th day after the first day of the assessment penalty. On and after the 31st day the penalty is one hundred dollars ($100) per day, not to exceed a total penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), regardless of the number of days, until the department receives the written notification.

(b) The commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of any real estate broker who fails to pay a penalty imposed under this section. In addition, the commissioner may bring an action in an appropriate court of this state to collect payment of the penalty.

(c) All penalties paid or collected under this section shall be deposited into the Consumer Recovery Account of the Real Estate Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 24.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.4.

(a) In compliance with Section 10235.5, every licensed real estate broker shall also display their license number on all advertisements where there is a solicitation for borrowers or potential investors. Every mortgage loan originator, as defined in Section 10166.01, shall also display the unique identifier assigned to that individual by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry on all advertisements where there is a solicitation for borrowers.

(b) The disclosures required by Sections 10232.4 and 10240 shall include the licensee’s license number, the mortgage loan originator’s unique identifier, if applicable, and the department’s license information telephone
 number.

(c) “Mortgage loan originator,” “unique identifier,” and “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” have the meanings set forth in Section 10166.01.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 69.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.5.

A real estate broker shall notify the department when he or she is no longer servicing or arranging loans subject to the reporting requirements of Section 10232. If a broker has already made reports required by this article within the year, he or she shall continue reports for that year, but shall notify the department prior to the expiration of that year that he or she will no longer be servicing or arranging loans for which reports are required. The department’s records, including those which may be disclosed by calling the license information telephone number of the department, may then be appropriately updated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 540, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.6.

(a) The commissioner, in his or her discretion, may audit any broker who conducts transactions subject to the provisions of this article. The audit shall be conducted after reasonable notice to the broker and shall include an examination of both of the following:

(1) Trust accounts under the control of the broker or in any manner affiliated with the broker.

(2) Nontrust accounts under the control of the broker or in any manner affiliated with the broker to which funds from trust accounts have been deposited other than for the payment of commissions, fees, costs, or expenses due to or incurred by the broker.

(b) The authority to audit these nontrust accounts shall be limited to instances where either an annual review or audit conducted by an independent certified public accountant or a departmental audit reveals unauthorized transfers of money to those accounts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 641, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.7.

(a) A real estate broker, when engaging in acts for which a license is required, who arranges a transaction pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 10237) or one or more provisions of the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code), shall clearly indicate in the real estate broker’s transaction file the provision or provisions of this code or the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 pertaining to qualification or exemption from qualification under which the transaction is being conducted. The real estate broker shall retain this information for the period specified in subdivision (a) of Section 10148.

(b) The real estate broker
 shall submit a copy of the information described in subdivision (a) to any investor from whom the real estate broker obtains funds in connection with the transaction, either directly or through an agent or affiliate, within 10 days of receipt of those funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 717, Sec. 10.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Claim of Exemption From Securities Qualification [10237. - 10239.3.]

10237.

This article applies only to the exemption from securities qualification claimed under Section 25102.5 of the Corporations Code. This article does not apply to any other exemption from securities qualification, including subdivision (e) of Section 25102 of the Corporations Code, that may be claimed without complying with this article, or to any permit to qualify the offer and sale of securities under the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code). Any transaction that involves the sale of or offer to sell a series of notes secured directly by interests in one or more parcels of real property, or the sale of undivided interests in a note secured directly by one or more parcels of real property
 equivalent to a series transaction, shall comply with all of the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 901, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 717, Sec. 11.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10238.

(a) A notice in the following form and containing the following information shall be filed with the commissioner within 30 days after the first transaction and within 30 days of any material change in the information required in the notice:TO:Real Estate Commissioner
Mortgage Loan Section
1651 Exposition Boulevard 
Sacramento, CA 95815This notice is filed pursuant to Sections 10237 and 10238 of the Business and Professions Code.
( ) Original Notice( ) Amended Notice
1.Name of the Broker conducting transaction under Section 10237:
2.Broker license identification number: 3.List the month the fiscal year ends: 4.Broker’s telephone number: 5.Firm name (if different from “1”):6.Street address (main location):# and StreetCityStateZIP Code7.Mailing address (if different from “6”):
8.Servicing agent: Identify by name, address, and
 telephone number the person or entity who will act as the servicing agent in transactions pursuant to Section 10237 (including the undersigned Broker if that is the case):9.Total number of multilender notes arranged: 10.Total number of interests sold to investors on the

  multilender’s notes:   ______11.Inspection of trust account (before answering this question, review the provisions of paragraph (3) of subdivision (k) of Section 10238).CHECK ONLY ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
( )The undersigned Broker is (or expects to be) required to file reports of inspection of its trust account(s) with the Real Estate Commissioner pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (k) of Section 10238.
Amount of Multilender Payments Collected Last Fiscal Quarter: Total Number of Investors Due Payments Last Fiscal Quarter: ( )The undersigned Broker is NOT (or does NOT expect to be) required to file reports of inspection of its trust account(s) with the Real Estate Commissioner pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (k) of Section 10238.
12.Signature. The contents of this notice are true and correct.
DateType Name of Broker
Signature of Broker or of Designated Officer of Corporate Broker
Type Name of Person(s) Signing This NoticeNOTE: AN AMENDED NOTICE MUST BE FILED BY THE BROKER WITHIN 30 DAYS OF ANY
 MATERIAL CHANGE IN THE INFORMATION REQUIRED TO BE SET FORTH HEREIN.
(b) A broker or person who becomes the servicing agent for notes or interests sold pursuant to this article, upon which payments due during any period of three consecutive months in the aggregate exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) or the number of persons entitled to the payments exceeds 120, shall file the notice required by subdivision (a) with the commissioner within 30 days after becoming the servicing agent.

(c) All advertising used for transactions under this article shall show the name of the broker and comply with Section 10235 of this code and Sections 260.302 and 2848 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations. Brokers and their agents are cautioned that a reference to a prospective investor that a transaction is conducted under
 this article may be deemed misleading or deceptive if this representation may reasonably be construed by the investor as an implication of merit or approval of the transaction.

(d) Each parcel of real property directly securing the notes or interests shall be located in this state, the note or notes shall not by their terms be subject to subordination to any subsequently created deed of trust upon the real property, and the note or notes shall not be promotional notes secured by liens on separate parcels of real property in one subdivision or in contiguous subdivisions. For purposes of this subdivision, a promotional note means a promissory note secured by a trust deed, executed on unimproved real property or executed after construction of an improvement of the property but before the first purchase of the property as so improved, or executed as a means of financing the first purchase of the property as so improved, that is subordinate, or by
 its terms may become subordinate, to any other trust deed on the property. However, the term “promotional note” does not include either of the following:

(1) A note that was executed in excess of three years prior to being offered for sale.

(2) A note secured by a first trust deed on real property in a subdivision that evidences a bona fide loan made in connection with the financing of the usual cost of the development in a residential, commercial, or industrial building or buildings on the property under a written agreement providing for the disbursement of the loan funds as costs are incurred or in relation to the progress of the work and providing for title insurance insuring the priority of the security as against mechanic’s and materialmen’s liens or for the final disbursement of at least 10 percent of the loan funds after the expiration of the period for the filing of
 mechanic’s and materialmen’s liens.

(e) The notes or interests shall be sold by or through a real estate broker, as principal or agent. At the time the notes or interests are originally sold or assigned, neither the broker nor an affiliate of the broker shall have an interest as owner, lessor, or developer of the property securing the loan, or any contractual right to acquire, lease, or develop the property securing the loan. This provision does not prohibit a broker from conducting the following transactions if, in either case, the disclosure statement furnished by the broker pursuant to subdivision (l) discloses the interest of the broker or affiliate in the transaction and the circumstances under which the broker or affiliate acquired the interest:

(1) A transaction in which the broker or an affiliate of the broker is acquiring the property pursuant to a foreclosure
 under, or sale pursuant to, a deed of trust securing a note for which the broker is the servicing agent or that the broker sold to the holder or holders.

(2) A transaction in which the broker or an affiliate of the broker is reselling from inventory property acquired by the broker pursuant to a foreclosure under, or sale pursuant to, a deed of trust securing a note for which the broker is the servicing agent or that the broker sold to the holder or holders.

(f) (1) The notes or interests shall not be sold to more than 10 persons, each of whom meets one or both of the qualifications of income or net worth set forth below and signs a statement, which shall be retained by the broker for four years, conforming to the following:Transaction Identifier:Name of Purchaser: Date:Check either one of the following, if true:( )My investment in the transaction does not exceed 10% of my net worth, exclusive of home, furnishings, and automobiles.( )My investment in the transaction does not exceed 10% of my adjusted gross income for federal income tax purposes for my last tax year or, in the alternative, as estimated for the current year.Signature(2) The number of offerees shall not be considered for the purposes of this section.

(3) Spouses and their dependents, and an individual and his or her dependents, shall be counted as one person.

(4) A retirement plan, trust, business trust, corporation, or other entity that is
 wholly owned by an individual and the individual’s spouse or the individual’s dependents, or any combination thereof, shall not be counted separately from the individual, but the investments of these entities shall be aggregated with those of the individual for the purposes of the statement required by paragraph (1). If the investments of any entities are required to be aggregated under this subdivision, the adjusted gross income or net worth of these entities may also be aggregated with the net worth, income, or both, of the individual.

(5) The “institutional investors” enumerated in subdivision (i) of Section 25102 or subdivision (c) of Section 25104 of the Corporations Code, or in a rule adopted pursuant thereto, shall not be counted.

(6) A partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other organization that was not specifically formed for the purpose of purchasing
 the security offered in reliance upon this exemption from securities qualification is counted as one person.

(g) The notes or interests of the purchasers shall be identical in their underlying terms, including the right to direct or require foreclosure, rights to and rate of interest, and other incidents of being a lender, and the sale to each purchaser pursuant to this section shall be upon the same terms, subject to adjustment for the face or principal amount or percentage interest purchased and for interest earned or accrued. This subdivision does not preclude different selling prices for interests to the extent that these differences are reasonably related to changes in the market value of the loan occurring between the sales of these interests. The interest of each purchaser shall be recorded pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 10234.

(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the aggregate principal amount of the notes or interests sold, together with the unpaid principal amount of any encumbrances upon the real property senior thereto, shall not exceed the following percentages of the current market value of each parcel of the real property, as determined in writing by the broker or appraiser pursuant to Section 10232.6, plus the amount for which the payment of principal and interest in excess of the percentage of current market value is insured for the benefit of the holders of the notes or interests by an insurer admitted to do business in this state by the Insurance Commissioner:(A)Single-family residence, owner occupied 80%(B)Single-family residence, not owner occupied 75%(C)Commercial properties and income-producing properties not described in (B) or (E)65%(D)Single-family residentially zoned lot or parcel that has installed offsite improvements including drainage, curbs, gutters, sidewalks, paved roads, and utilities as mandated by the political subdivision having jurisdiction over the lot or parcel
 65%(E)Land that produces income from crops, timber, or minerals60%(F)Land that is not income producing but has been zoned for (and if required, approved for subdivision as) commercial or residential development 50%(G)Other real property 35%(2) The percentage amounts specified in paragraph (1) may be exceeded when and to the extent that the broker determines that the encumbrance of the property in excess of these percentages is reasonable and prudent considering all relevant factors pertaining to the real property. However, in no event shall the aggregate principal amount of the notes or interests sold, together with the unpaid principal amount of any encumbrances upon the property senior thereto, exceed 80 percent of the current fair market value of improved real property or 50 percent of the current fair market value of unimproved real property, except in the case of a single-family zoned lot or parcel as defined in paragraph (1), which shall not exceed 65 percent of the current fair market value of that lot or parcel, plus the amount insured as specified in paragraph (1). A written statement shall be prepared by the broker
 that sets forth the material considerations and facts that the broker relies upon for his or her determination, which shall be retained as a part of the broker’s record of the transaction. Either a copy of the statement or the information contained therein shall be included in the disclosures required pursuant to subdivision (l).

(3) A copy of the appraisal or the broker’s evaluation, for each parcel of real property securing the notes or interests, shall be delivered to each purchaser. For purposes of this paragraph, “appraisal” means a written estimate of value based upon the assembling, analyzing, and reconciling of facts and value indicators for the real property in question. A broker shall not purport to make an appraisal unless he or she is qualified on the basis of special training, preparation, or experience.

(4) For construction or rehabilitation loans, the term “current
 market value” may be deemed to be the value of the completed project if the following safeguards are met:

(A) An independent neutral third-party escrow holder is used for all deposits and disbursements.

(B) The loan is fully funded, with the entire loan amount to be deposited in escrow prior to the recording of the deed or deeds of trust.

(C) A comprehensive, detailed draw schedule is used to ensure proper and timely disbursements to allow for completion of the project.

(D) The disbursement draws from the escrow account are based on verification from an independent qualified person who certifies that the work completed to date meets the related codes and standards and that the draws were made in accordance with the construction contract and draw
 schedule. For purposes of this subparagraph, “independent qualified person” means a person who is not an employee, agent, or affiliate of the broker and who is a licensed architect, general contractor, structural engineer, or active local government building inspector acting in his or her official capacity.

(E) An appraisal is completed by a qualified and licensed appraiser in accordance with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice (USPAP).

(F) In addition to the transaction documentation required by subdivision (i), the documentation shall include a detailed description of actions that may be taken in the event of a failure to complete the project, whether that failure is due to default, insufficiency of funds, or other causes.

(G) The entire amount of the loan does not exceed two million five
 hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000).

(5) If a note or an interest will be secured by more than one parcel of real property, for the purpose of determining the maximum amount of the note or interest, each security property shall be assigned a portion of the note or interest that shall not exceed the percentage of current market value determined by, and in accordance with, the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2).

(i) The documentation of the transaction shall require both of the following:

(1) A default upon any note or interest is a default upon all notes or interests.

(2) The holders of more than 50 percent of the recorded beneficial interests of the notes or interests may govern the actions to be taken on behalf of all holders in accordance with
 Section 2941.9 of the Civil Code in the event of default or foreclosure for matters that require direction or approval of the holders, including designation of the broker, servicing agent, or other person acting on their behalf, and the sale, encumbrance, or lease of real property owned by the holders resulting from foreclosure or receipt of a deed in lieu of foreclosure. The terms called for by this subdivision may be included in the deed of trust, in the assignment of interests, or in any other documentation as is necessary or appropriate to make them binding on the parties.

(j) (1) The broker shall not accept any purchase or loan funds or other consideration from a prospective lender or purchaser, or directly or indirectly cause the funds or other consideration to be deposited in an escrow or trust account, except as to a specific loan or note secured by a deed of trust that the broker owns, is authorized to negotiate,
 or is unconditionally obligated to buy.

(2) All funds received by the broker from the purchasers or lenders shall be handled in accordance with Section 10145 for disbursement to the persons thereto entitled upon recordation of the interests of the purchasers or lenders in the note and deed of trust. No provision of this article shall be construed as modifying or superseding applicable law regulating the escrow holder in any transaction or the handling of the escrow account.

(3) The books and records of the broker or servicing agent, or both, shall be maintained in a manner that readily identifies transactions under this article and the receipt and disbursement of funds in connection with these transactions.

(4) If required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (k), the review by the independent certified public accountant
 shall include a sample of transactions, as reflected in the records of the trust account required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (k), and the bank statements and supporting documents. These documents shall be reviewed for compliance with this article with respect to the handling and distribution of funds. The sample shall be selected at random by the accountant from all these transactions and shall consist of both of the following:

(A) Three sales made or 5 percent of the sales made pursuant to this article during the period for which the examination is conducted, whichever is greater.

(B) Ten payments processed or 2 percent of payments processed under this article during the period for which the examination is conducted, whichever is greater.

(5) For the purposes of this subdivision, the transaction that
 constitutes a “sale” is the series of transactions by which a series of notes of a maker, or the interests in the note of a maker, are sold or issued to their various purchasers under this article, including all receipts and disbursements in that process of funds received from the purchasers or lenders. The transaction that constitutes a “payment,” for the purposes of this subdivision, is the receipt of a payment from the person obligated on the note or from some other person on behalf of the person so obligated, including the broker or servicing agent, and the distribution of that payment to the persons entitled thereto. If a payment involves an advance paid by the broker or servicing agent as the result of a dishonored check, the inspection shall identify the source of funds from which the payment was made or, in the alternative, the steps that are reasonably necessary to determine that there was not a disbursement of trust funds. The accountant shall inspect for compliance with the following specific
 provisions of this section: paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subdivision and paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (k).
